Maryland, session 2025, SB0577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 9. DISTRIBUTION OF LITERATURE TO PURCHASERS OF FIREARMS AND
AMMUNITION.
5–901.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0577*

SENATE BILL 577
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AMMUNITION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–133.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) “FIREARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF THIS TITLE.
5–902.
(A) (1) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL:
(I) PREPARE LITERATURE RELATING TO FIREARMS AND
AMMUNITION THAT INCLUDES INFORMATION REGARDING:
1. FIREARM SAFETY;
2. FIREARM TRAINING;
3. SUICIDE PREVENTION;
4. MENTAL HEALTH AWARENESS; AND
5. CONFLICT RESOLUTION; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE LITERATURE TO ALL COUNTY HEALTH
DEPARTMENTS IN THE STATE.
(2) EACH COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE
LITERATURE RECEIVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO ALL
ESTABLISHMENTS THAT SELL FIREARMS OR AMMUNITION WITHIN THE COUNTY.
(B) AN ESTABLISHMENT THAT RECEIVES LITERATURE UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(2) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) MAKE THE LITERATURE VISIBLE AND AVAILABLE AT THE POINT
OF SALE FOR ANY FIREARM OR AMMUNITION PURCHASE; AND
(2) DISTRIBUTE THE LITERATURE TO EACH PERSON WHO PURCHASES
A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION.
(C) (1) EACH COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL AUTHORIZE A
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COUNTY’S HEALTH DEPARTMENT WHO MAY ISSUE A

SENATE BILL 577 3
CITATION TO AN OWNER OF AN ESTABLISHMENT WITHIN THE COUNTY’S
JURISDICTION THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO:
1. FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A CIVIL PENALTY NOT
EXCEEDING $500; AND
2. FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
(II) A CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL
BE PAID TO THE COUNTY THAT ISSUED THE CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.